District of Columbia statutes.
26-304

Form and contents of application for license.

(a)

An application for a license under this chapter shall be in writing under oath in the form prescribed by the Superintendent [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking].

(b)

The application shall include:

(1)

If the applicant is an individual, the applicant’s name, business address and telephone number, and residence address and telephone number;

(2)

If the applicant is a partnership or other non-corporate business association, the business name, business address and telephone number, and the residence address and telephone number of each:

(A)

General partner, if the applicant is a limited partnership;

(B)

General partner who holds the interest in the partnership or more than 10% interest if the applicant is a general partnership; or

(C)

Member, if the applicant is a limited liability company or other non-corporate business association;

(3)

If the applicant is a corporation:

(A)

The name, address, and telephone number of the corporate entity; and

(B)

The name, business telephone number, and the residence and telephone number of the president, senior vice presidents, secretary, treasurer, each director, and each stockholder owning or controlling 10% or more of any class of stock in the corporation;

(4)

The applicant’s business plan;

(5)

The name under which the check cashing business is to be conducted;

(6)

The name and address of the applicant’s registered agent;

(7)

The location at which the applicant proposes to conduct business;

(8)

If the applicant seeks to conduct business from a mobile unit, the District registration number or other identification of the mobile unit and the area in which the applicant proposes to operate the mobile unit;

(9)

If the applicant seeks to conduct business from a limited station, the group of employees that would be served and the location at which these employees would be served; and

(10)

Any other information that the Superintendent [Commissioner] requires.

History

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 5, 45 DCR 1782

Section References

This section is referenced in § 26-308.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-1104.